hunspell/cy/cy.aff
SFX D   o           ioch       o
SFX D   o           iont       o
SFX D   o           ier        o
SFX D   o           ies        o
SFX D   o           iest       o
SFX D   o           ith        o
SFX D   o           iff        o
SFX D   o           ion        o
SFX D   o           ian        o
SFX D   ian         iaf        ian
SFX D   ian         i          ian
SFX D   ian         ia         ian
SFX D   ian         ia'i       ian
SFX D   ian         ia'u       ian
SFX D   ian         ia'ch      ian
SFX D   ian         ia'n       ian
SFX D   ian         ia'r       ian
SFX D   ian         iwn        ian
SFX D   ian         iwch       ian
SFX D   ian         iant       ian
SFX D   ian         ir         ian
SFX D   ian         it         ian
SFX D   ian         iet        ian
SFX D   ian         iai        ian
SFX D   ian         iai'i      ian
SFX D   ian         iai'u      ian
SFX D   ian         iai'ch     ian
SFX D   ian         iai'n      ian
SFX D   ian         iai'r      ian
SFX D   ian         iem        ian
SFX D   ian         iech       ian
SFX D   ian         ient       ian
SFX D   ian         id         ian
SFX D   ian         iais       ian
SFX D   ian         iaist      ian
SFX D   ian         iodd       ian
SFX D   ian         iasom      ian
SFX D   ian         iasoch     ian
SFX D   ian         iasant     ian
SFX D   ian         iwyd       ian
SFX D   ian         iaswn      ian
SFX D   ian         iasit      ian
SFX D   ian         iaset      ian
SFX D   ian         iasai      ian
SFX D   ian         iasai'i    ian
SFX D   ian         iasai'u    ian
SFX D   ian         iasai'ch   ian
SFX D   ian         iasai'n    ian
SFX D   ian         iasai'r    ian
SFX D   ian         iasem      ian
SFX D   ian         iasech     ian
SFX D   ian         iasent     ian
SFX D   ian         iasid      ian
SFX D   ian         ied        ian
SFX D   ian         iwyf       ian
SFX D   ian         ych        ian
SFX D   ian         io         ian
SFX D   ian         io'i       ian
SFX D   ian         io'u       ian
SFX D   ian         io'ch      ian
SFX D   ian         io'n       ian
SFX D   ian         io'r       ian
SFX D   ian         iom        ian
SFX D   ian         ioch       ian
SFX D   ian         iont       ian
SFX D   ian         ier        ian
SFX D   ian         ies        ian
SFX D   ian         iest       ian
SFX D   ian         ith        ian
SFX D   ian         iff        ian
SFX D   ian         ion        ian
