hunspell/cy/cy.dic
enweiri/DMNQ
hacti/DNQ
wichi/DMNQ
cydi/DLNQ
reweiddi/DNQ
plaeni/DLNQ
rosti/DNQ
pwffi/DLNQ
dreuli/DNQ
feincnodi/ADNQ
wawchi/DMNQ
glipi/DNQ
clwci/DLNQ
lastwreiddi/DNQ
nyrsi/DNQ
cyti/DLNQ
rhochi/ADNQ
ailgynigi/DNPQ
sgwri/DNQ
llurguni/DNQ
apwynti/DNPQ
ddeisyfi/ADNQ
staeni/DNQ
ymliwi/DNQ
diwbi/DNQ
luddi/DNQ
e-bosti/DNQ
clunheci/DLNQ
ddadwreiddi/DNQ
arnofi/DNPQ
ddrili/DNQ
carboneiddi/DLNQ
gyfatali/DNQ
ddripi/DNQ
ddadweini/DNQ
cychi/ADLNQ
leinasi/DNQ
gontracti/DNQ
adleoli/DNQ
baffi/DNQ
fecaneiddi/DNQ
beici/DNQ
lyffetheiri/DNQ
pinbwynti/DLNQ
or-hawli/DMNQ
cawli/DLNQ
gelci/ADNQ
farneisi/DNQ
gosti/DNQ
cnydi/DLNQ
llafuri/DNQ
bugeili/DNQ
flodi/DNQ
cyrni/DLNQ
reoleiddi/DNQ
ddad-ddyfri/DNQ
ailddiwygi/DNPQ
ergydi/DNQ
dwdli/DNQ
sancteiddi/DNQ
rholi/DNQ
hymlidi/DNQ
tapi/ADLNQ
taro/ADLN
gwyso/DNQ
preswyli/DLNQ
ffulli/DNQ
ddisgrifi/DNQ
drosdeipi/DNQ
ailgyfeiri/DNPQ
stwnsi/DNQ
ymguri/DNQ
oeli/DMNQ
atgofi/DNPQ
ragdybi/DNQ
ragrithi/DNQ
ddiwreiddi/DNQ
brinti/DNQ
pleidi/DLNQ
fireini/DNQ
parasiwti/DLNQ
holi/ADNQ
freci/DN
ysloti/DNQ
goedi/DNQ
byrnian/DT
ffrydi/DNQ
dragi/DNQ
tici/DLNQ
haldi/DNQ
dendi/DNQ
disgleiri/DNQ
cyfeirnodi/ADLNQ
ymafaeli/DNQ
safi/ADNQ
sglefri/DNQ
fendithi/DNQ
arogleiddi/DNPQ
deli/DNQ
di-fuddi/DNQ
bigiti/DNQ
tisi/DLNQ
rofi/DNQ
baragleidi/DNQ
ddeinti/DNQ
hysgryti/DNQ
costi/DLNQ
hergydi/DNQ
didroedi/DNQ
pleidleisi/DLNQ
hymwyllti/DNQ
drawsffurfi/DNQ
hymdrwsi/DNQ
ddamni/DNQ
rhwchi/DNQ
glunherci/DNQ
ddyfeisi/DNQ
gamwari/DNQ
tresi/DLN
rybuddi/DNQ
ymroli/DNQ
fyrni/ADNQ
hwylfyrddi/DNQ
leici/DNQ
leidi/DNQ
adleisi/DNPQ
goco/DN
godo/DNQ
glampi/DNQ
hiengeiddi/DNQ
drili/DNQ
ffeiri/DNQ
ceci/DLNQ
camdreuli/DLNQ
cogini/DLNQ
rhici/DNQ
rwbi/DNQ
hwinci/DNQ
garpi/ADN
cynllwyni/ADLNQ
hystumi/DNQ
gogini/DNQ
argeisi/DNPQ
dibrisi/DNQ
crensi/DLNQ
ploti/DLNQ
rwpi/DNQ
beichi/DNQ
meincnodi/ADNQ
cydfenthyci/ADLNQ
llabyddi/DNQ
lafoeri/ADNQ
sgwrsi/DNQ
grabi/DNQ
arthian/DP
ailwiri/DNPQ
frwyli/DNQ
composti/DLNQ
fancawi/DNQ
smoci/DNQ
hifi/DNQ
grensi/DNQ
ffansi/DN
blasi/ADNQ
benlini/DNQ
bleidleisi/DNQ
hymwreiddi/DNQ
adysgrifi/DNPQ
cydarweini/DLNQ
gwli/DNQ
cropi/DLNQ
hymofidi/DNQ
folo/DNQ
fomi/DNQ
gwri/DNQ
cyfori/ADLNQ
fanteisi/DNQ
ogleisi/DMNQ
cwaffti/DLNQ
gapi/DNQ
lithi/DNQ
gari/ADNQ
foldi/DNQ
faentumi/DNQ
lloci/DNQ
blaeni/ADNQ
wifri/ADMNQ
carpi/ADLN
monitori/DNQ
atseini/DNPQ
hildi/DNQ
moldi/DNQ
perswadi/DLNQ
hymgomi/DNQ
ailfformati/DNPQ
ddobi/DNQ
peinti/DLNQ
gownti/DNQ
bodsoleiddi/DNQ
rhuchi/DNQ
ddatguddi/DNQ
fragaldi/DNQ
dargyfeiri/DNQ
craci/DLNQ
hymlafuri/DNQ
rheweiddi/DNQ
erlidi/DNQ
rheoleiddi/DNQ
guddi/DNQ
sloti/DNQ
buteini/DNQ
ddosi/DNQ
ddoti/DNQ
cyffi/DLNQ
aresti/DNPQ
distrywi/DNQ
plici/DLNQ
crapi/DLNQ
galli/ADNQ
gomposti/DNQ
niwtraleiddi/DNQ
fapi/DNQ
flysi/ADNQ
bryfoci/DNQ
dosturi/DN
ailyswiri/DNPQ
adweithi/DNPQ
ffugi/DNQ
breichaidi/DNQ
aeli/DNPQ
heitemeiddi/DNQ
eitemeiddi/DNQ
amneidi/DNPQ
ddifei/DNQ
gydlafuri/DNQ
hedliwi/DNQ
barasiwti/DNQ
rhagchwili/DNQ
gwffi/DNQ
sbari/DNQ
pranci/DLNQ
rowli/DNQ
fwyngloddi/DNQ
gyfarweini/DNQ
grewci/DNQ
dreilli/DNQ
camarweini/DLNQ
posti/DLNQ
hymwthi/DNQ
lawdi/DNQ
ymchwili/DNQ
bytheiri/DNQ
ecsbloeti/DNQ
rydi/ADMNQ
grewti/DNQ
dosi/DNQ
cleci/DLN
fictimeiddi/DNQ
geinci/DNQ
nodi/ADNQ
himpi/DNQ
hapeli/DNQ
calci/DLNQ
bonclusti/DNQ
clemi/DLNQ
reidi/DNQ
floeddi/DNQ
oduthi/DMNQ
pipi/DLNQ
blymi/DNQ
cywaini/DLNQ
gwesti/DNQ
gyfreithi/DNQ
arthi/DNQ
hiffi/DNQ
hymffurfi/DNQ
gernodi/DNQ
freichaidi/DNQ
dadreoleiddi/DNQ
morgeisi/DNQ
drafriwi/DNQ
ocheneidi/DNQ
glafoeri/ADNQ
apelian/DP
cyd-fywi/DLNQ
codi/DLN
obeithi/DMNQ
gyno/DNQ
cogi/DLNQ
diwreiddi/DNQ
ddisi/DNQ
gyti/DNQ
ildi/DMNQ
cydymffurfi/DLNQ
lofruddi/DNQ
ddadfygi/DNQ
amgrypti/DNPQ
prentisi/DLNQ
gamarweini/DNQ
dapi/ADNQ
bachi/ADNQ
adhawli/DNPQ
fewnoli/DNQ
ail-lansi/DNPQ
fownti/DNQ
sbwyli/DNQ
twlci/DLNQ
ddaili/DNQ
wffti/DNQ
barci/DNQT
stori/DN
wrthbwynti/DMNQ
gywreini/DNQ
alini/DNPQ
drafaeli/DNQ
chwimi/DNQ
neidi/DNQ
dygyfori/ADNQ
ailwampi/DNPQ
breinti/DNQ
ddiwaini/DNQ
rhampi/DNQ
cneifi/DLNQ
fuddi/DNQ
cwli/DLNQ
streici/DNQ
hesbi/DNQ
cnoci/DLNQ
hymrithi/DNQ
seli/DNQ
llarpi/DNQ
gysefeilli/DNQ
ddiffeithi/DNQ
anghofi/DNPQ
diti/DNQ
capi/DLNQ
lluchi/DNQ
rybedi/ADNQ
diwraiddi/DNQ
hymgydi/DNQ
catalogi/DLNQ
garboneiddi/DNQ
hwaldi/DNQ
ailweiri/DNPQ
ddyrnodi/DNQ
tripi/DLNQ
loli/DNQ
proffidi/DLNQ
ceibi/DLNQ
hisgili/DNQ
drysti/DNQ
adleolian/DP
cydgyfeiri/DLNQ
matriciwleiddi/DNQ
bonti/DNQ
heri/DNQ
hymdeithi/DNQ
cici/DLNQ
pwynti/DLNQ
rhagfyfyri/DNQ
bwli/DN
atali/DNPQ
faeti/DNQ
wali/DMNQ
cyd-ddefnyddi/DLNQ
dirywi/DNQ
wrteithi/DMNQ
wari/DMNQ
ddraffti/DNQ
telecsi/DLNQ
droedi/DNQ
baco/DN
dihainti/DNQ
buddi/DNQ
foderneiddi/DNQ
he-bosti/DNQ
tangloddi/DLNQ
ddadreoleiddi/DNQ
lefeini/DNQ
cydofidi/DLNQ
effeithi/DNQ
rinci/DNQ
asideiddi/DNPQ
basi/DNQ
ffarmi/DNQ
moderneiddi/DNQ
glwci/DNQ
gofleidi/DNQ
hymgyfnewidi/DNQ
larpi/DNQ
cyfatali/DLNQ
prifi/DLNQ
gamdreuli/DNQ
dybi/DNQ
dyci/DNQ
daifi/DNQ
ddygyfori/ADNQ
luchi/DNQ
gynllwyni/ADNQ
crawni/ADLNQ
ddarni/DNQ
ymgeisi/DNQ
ymlaci/DNQ
fartsi/DNQ
glapi/DNQ
sarsi/DNQ
wiri/DMNQ
paenti/DLNQ
strimi/DNQ
gychi/ADNQ
disgrifi/DNQ
trysti/DLNQ
wialenodi/DNQ
plesi/DLNQ
closi/DLNQ
adfyfyri/DNPQ
ddemocrateiddi/DNQ
gyd-deithi/DNQ
dramateiddi/DNQ
gawli/DNQ
ragarweini/DNQ
lici/DNQ
feimi/DNQ
ddramateiddi/DNQ
gnydi/DNQ
dadfygi/DNQ
ailymafaeli/DNPQ
